Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Chapter 3 Administrative Procedure
§ 16-3-108.
Contested cases; admissible evidence; cross-examination; judicial notice.

In contested cases irrelevant, immaterial or unduly repetitious evidence shall be excluded and no sanction shall be imposed or order issued except upon consideration of the whole record or such portion thereof as may be cited by any party and unless supported by the type of evidence commonly relied upon by reasonably prudent men in the conduct of their serious affairs. Agencies shall give effect to the rules of privilege recognized by law. Subject to these requirements and agency rule if the interests of the parties will not be prejudiced substantially testimony may be received in written form subject to the right of cross-examination as provided in subsection (c) of this section.

Documentary evidence may be received in the form of copies or excerpts, if the original is not readily available. Upon request, parties shall be given opportunity to compare the copy with the original.

A party may conduct cross-examinations required for a full and true disclosure of the facts and a party is entitled to confront all opposing witnesses.

Notice may be taken of judicially cognizable facts. In addition notice may be taken of technical or scientific facts within the agency’s specialized knowledge or of information, data and material included within the agency’s files. The parties shall be notified either before or during the hearing or after the hearing but before the agency decision of material facts noticed, and they shall be afforded an opportunity to contest the facts noticed.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 108, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 9-276.26; W.S. 1977, §

9-4-108

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Work history admissible. —

Wyoming Workers' Safety and Compensation Division properly admitted two exhibits related to the claimant's work history as the evidence was relevant in determining what caused his knee problems and whether they were work related. Johnson v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2014 WY 33, 321 P.3d 318,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 2014).

Anonymous letter not admissible. —

Wyoming Workers' Safety and Compensation Division erred in admitting an anonymous letter stating that the claimant was taking advantage of the workers' compensation system where the only rationale for admitting the letter was that it was in the Division's file. Johnson v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2014 WY 33, 321 P.3d 318,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 2014).

Admission of inadmissible evidence not reversible. —

Wyoming Workers' Safety and Compensation Division's error in admitting an anonymous letter was not reversible where the Division had not relied upon it in denying the claim. Johnson v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2014 WY 33, 321 P.3d 318,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 2014).

Rules of evidence. —

A hearing examiner in a worker's compensation hearing is not bound by the Wyoming Rules of Evidence, and the decision regarding admissibility of evidence is committed to the sound discretion of the hearing examiner who abuses that discretion when his decision shocks the conscience of the court. Everheart v. S & L Indus. (In re Everheart), 957 P.2d 847,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 1998).

Hearsay admissible. —

Hearsay that is otherwise admissible under subsection (a), and that is probative, trustworthy and credible may be received in evidence at an agency hearing. Story v. Wyoming State Bd. of Medical Examiners, 721 P.2d 1013,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 573

(Wyo. 1986).

Hearsay evidence is admissible in an administrative proceeding if it satisfies the requirements of this section and is probative, trustworthy and credible. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div. v. Rivera, 796 P.2d 447,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 1990); Goddard v. Colonel Bozeman's Restaurant, 914 P.2d 1233,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1996); Clark v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div., 968 P.2d 436,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Wyo. 1998).

Although a broad range of informal evidence, including hearsay, is admissible in a worker's compensation hearing, any offered evidence must be probative, trustworthy, and credible. Lunde v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div., 6 P.3d 1256,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 2000).

The Wyoming office of administrative hearings is entitled to consider the type of evidence commonly relied upon by reasonably prudent men in the conduct of their serious affairs pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 16-3-108(a); while it may be proper to consider statements from an anonymous source, that evidence alone can not serve as the basis for a reasonable decision.
Gray v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers'
Safety & Comp.
Div., 2008 WY 115, 193 P.3d 246,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Oct. 3, 2008).

Excluding hearsay testimony not abuse of discretion. —

Hearing examiner in workers' compensation proceeding did not abuse her discretion by excluding hearsay testimony where former manager's statements to employee about employer's policy on work-related injuries were irrelevant and immaterial, and where employee testified she was aware that she could apply for workers' compensation benefits and no one told her not to file a workers' compensation claim, and therefore there was no basis to estop the workers' safety and compensation division from denying employee's claim. Clark v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div., 968 P.2d 436,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Wyo. 1998).

Hearing examiner properly excluded the workers' compensation claimant's proposed testimony regarding statements alleged to have been made by one of his doctors because the testimony was not helpful or trustworthy. Trump v. State, 2013 WY 140, 312 P.3d 802,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 2013).

Expert testimony not required in tax cases. —

Expert testimony is not required in tax cases; substantial evidence supports agencies' findings when proper and sufficient testimony has been presented through qualified employees. Thunder Basin Coal Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 896 P.2d 1336,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 1995), reh'g denied,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. June 29, 1995).

Party-opponent's admission admissible. —

Deputy clerk's testimony, which was not hearsay because it was an admission by a party-opponent, was admissible, where there was no showing that the testimony was irrelevant, immaterial or unduly repetitious. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div. v. Rivera, 796 P.2d 447,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 1990).

Written medical report was admissible in worker's compensation hearing

where opposing counsel had notice of the report, had a copy of the report, was afforded the opportunity to cross-examine the doctor who prepared the report and, after insisting upon the opportunity to cross-examine, waived that opportunity at the close of the hearing by failing to exercise it. Hansen v. MR. D's Food Ctr., 827 P.2d 371,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1992).

In-person testimony. —

The hearing examiner did not abuse her discretion when she rendered her decision to deny employee's claim for worker's compensation benefits without having the benefit of in-person testimony. Everheart v. S & L Indus. (In re Everheart), 957 P.2d 847,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 1998).

Wyoming Medical Commission erred in limiting an employee's testimony to matters not discussed in a discovery deposition; if the hearing officer desired to limit the taking of evidence to save time and avoid redundancy under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 16-3-108(a), the evidence restricted should have been the deposition testimony, in favor of the live testimony.
Morris v. State Ex Rel. Wyo. Workers'
Safety & Comp. Div., 2012 WY 71, 276 P.3d 399,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(May 22, 2012).

Testimony by department of revenue employees. —

Where the department of revenue presented testimony from department of revenue employees and from department of audit employees to support an additional assessment of taxes, that evidence was competent, and it was sufficient to support the state board of equalization's decision. Thunder Basin Coal Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 896 P.2d 1336,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 1995), reh'g denied,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. June 29, 1995).

Dated character evidence admissible. —

Wyoming Board of Chiropractic Examiners did not err in allowing a non-complaining witness to testify about his conduct during her treatment which occurred over 20 years prior because the testimony was not immaterial, irrelevant, unduly repetitious and the Board was not required to exclude it for any of the reasons contained in this section.
Greene v. State ex rel. Wyo. Bd. of Chiropractic Examiners, 2009 WY 42, 204 P.3d 285,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2009).

Evidence properly disallowed as irrelevant and unduly repetitious. —

See Ririe v. Board of Trustees, 674 P.2d 214,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 391

(Wyo. 1983).

Pursuant to review under Wyo. R. App. P. 12.09(a) and Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 16-3-114(c), there was substantial evidence supported a claimant's award of unemployment insurance benefits because irrelevant evidence of an alleged conspiracy was properly excluded under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 16-3-108(a) and claimant's conduct was determined to be ordinary negligence in an isolated instance and not misconduct under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-3-311(f). Further, the hearing officer complied with Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 16-3-112(a) to provide the claimant's former employer with a fair and impartial hearing.
Aspen Ridge Law Offices, P.C. v. Wyo. Dep't of Empl., 2006 WY 129, 143 P.3d 911,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2006).

Information regarding traffic not admissible. —

In determining whether to grant a conditional use permit to allow for off-street parking in a high-density residential zone, information regarding traffic in the area was not information of which the court could take official notice where it was not based on: (1) cognizable facts in the formal evidence of the case, or (2) technical or scientific facts within the commission's specialized knowledge. Heiss v. City of Casper Planning & Zoning Comm'n, 941 P.2d 27,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 1997).

Judicial notice well defined. —

The area of judicial notice available in administrative proceedings has been well and closely defined by subsection (d). Wyoming Bancorporation v. Bonham, 527 P.2d 432,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 240

(Wyo. 1974).

Taking judicial notice was improper. —

Medical Commission Hearing Panel's order denying a claimant worker's compensation benefits for gastrointestinal problems violated the Wyoming Administrative Procedures Act by improperly taking judicial notice of the etiology of a Schatzki's ring, which was a contested fact. The Panel also failed to provide the parties with notice of the material facts noticed or allow the parties an opportunity to contest the facts. Olivas v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. (In re Workers Comp. Claim), 2006 WY 29, 130 P.3d 476,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 2006).

Notice of administrative files permitted. —

The rules, statutes and case law permit agencies to take official notice of their administrative files. In re Campbell County, 731 P.2d 1174,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 388

(Wyo. 1987).

A hearing examiner could take judicial notice of interrogatories and the answers thereto without informing the workers' compensation claimant because those materials were part of the agency's files. Pederson v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div., 939 P.2d 740,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1997).

Applied

in

Lentsch v. Marshall, 741 F.2d 301,

1984 U.S. App. LEXIS 19631

(10th Cir. 1984); Casper Oil Co. v. Evenson, 888 P.2d 221,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1995); Naibauer v. Board of Platte County Comm'rs, 895 P.2d 445,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 1995); Amax Coal W., Inc. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 896 P.2d 1329,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 1995); Roush v. Pari-Mutuel Comm'n, 917 P.2d 1133,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 80

, 59 A.L.R.5th 803 (Wyo. 1996).

Quoted

in

Associated Enters., Inc. v. Toltec Watershed Imp. Dist., 578 P.2d 1359,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 293

(Wyo. 1978); Gulf Oil Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 693 P.2d 227,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 422

(Wyo. 1985); Thornberg v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Comp. Div., 913 P.2d 863,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1996); Smith v. State ex rel. DOT, 11 P.3d 931,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 202

(Wyo. 2000); Hayes v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2013 WY 96, 307 P.3d 843,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Aug 13, 2013).

Cited

in

Pan Am. Petroleum Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 446 P.2d 550,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 209

(Wyo. 1968); Baros v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Comp. Div., 834 P.2d 1143,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1992); Mayland v. Flitner, 2001 WY 69, 28 P.3d 838,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 2001); RT Communs., Inc. v. PSC, 2003 WY 145, 79 P.3d 36,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 2003); Tarraferro v. State ex rel. Wyo. Med. Comm'n., 2005 WY 155, 123 P.3d 912,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(2005).

Relevant evidence admissible. —

Evidence as
to a sediment retention pond on a storm-water collection facility's
property and the facility's building a road for the landowners' use
to access their property over the facility's property was admissible
because it did not violate any portion of the appellate court's prior
mandate in the case and was relevant to issues that a board of county
commissioners had to resolve to rationally and justly decide the
case. Zowada v. Mullinax Concrete Serv. Co., 2014 WY 121, 335 P.3d 455,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 2014).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Industrial Siting Legislation: The Wyoming Industrial Development Information and Siting Act — Advance or Retreat?” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 27 (1976).

For article, “A State Central Panel Hearing Officer System for Wyoming,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 497 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes “adjudicative facts” within meaning of Rule 201 of Federal Rules of Evidence concerning judicial notice of adjudicative facts, 150 ALR Fed 543.

§ 16-3-109.
Contested cases; consideration of record; exceptions to decision; briefs and oral argument.

The agency shall consider the whole record or any portion stipulated to by the parties. In the event a recommended decision is rendered all parties shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to file exceptions thereto which shall be deemed a part of the record. All parties as a matter of right shall be permitted to file a brief with the agency and oral argument shall be allowed in the discretion of the agency.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 108, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 9-276.27; W.S. 1977, § 9-4-109; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

School board's review of the whole record. —

Although a school board's decision terminating a teacher was required to be based on consideration of the entire record received by a hearing officer, pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

16-3-109

and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

21-7-110

, there was no statutory or due process requirement that the school board personally and independently review the evidentiary record. Wadsworth v. Bd. of Trs. Sch. Dist. No. Two, 2014 WY 7, 316 P.3d 541,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 2014).

Applied

in

Employment Sec. Comm'n v. Bryant, 704 P.2d 1311,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 546

(Wyo. 1985).

Law reviews. —

For article, “A State Central Panel Hearing Officer System for Wyoming,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 497 (1986).

§ 16-3-110.
Contested cases; final decision; contents; notification.

A final decision or order adverse to a party in a contested case shall be in writing or dictated into the record. The final decision shall include findings of fact and conclusions of law separately stated. Findings of fact if set forth in statutory language, shall be accompanied by a concise and explicit statement of the underlying facts supporting the findings. Parties shall be notified either personally or by mail of any decision or order. A copy of the decision and order shall be delivered or mailed forthwith to each party or to his attorney of record.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 108, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 9-276.28; W.S. 1977, § 9-4-110; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

There must be some finality in administrative proceedings, as in judicial proceedings.

Wyoming Bancorporation v. Bonham, 527 P.2d 432,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 240

(Wyo. 1974).

Administrative agencies must make sufficiently detailed findings

to support their finding of ultimate facts or conclusions; failure to do so subjects the finding to attack as being arbitrary, capricious and contrary to law. Mountain Fuel Supply Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 662 P.2d 878,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 312

(Wyo. 1983).

In discharging its duty under this section, the agency must make findings of basic facts upon all of the material issues in the proceeding and upon which its ultimate findings of fact or conclusions are based. Mayland v. Flitner, 2001 WY 69, 28 P.3d 838,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 2001).

Duty of agency to make findings of fact and conclusions of law separately stated. —

To aid a reviewing court in the performance of the limited functions assigned to it by § 16-3-114(c), and particularly with reference to technical factual issues which must be resolved, this section wisely requires an agency in a contested case to include in its final decision findings of fact and conclusions of law separately stated. Such a requirement imposes upon an agency the duty to make findings of basic facts upon all of the material issues in the proceeding and upon which its ultimate findings of fact or conclusions are based. Unless that is done, there is no rational basis for judicial review. Pan Am. Petroleum Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 446 P.2d 550,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 209

(Wyo. 1968); Powell v. Board of Trustees, 550 P.2d 1112,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. 1976); Larsen v. Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 569 P.2d 87,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 316

(Wyo. 1977); Foremost Life Ins. Co. v. Langdon, 633 P.2d 938,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 371

(Wyo. 1981).

The basic findings of fact must be made on all material issues and ultimate facts. In re Campbell County, 731 P.2d 1174,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 388

(Wyo. 1987).

This section requires findings of basic facts upon all of the material issues in the proceeding and upon which the ultimate findings of fact or conclusions are based. Each ultimate fact or conclusion is to be thoroughly explained in order for the reviewing court to determine the basis upon which the ultimate fact or conclusion was reached. Without compliance with this provision, there can be no rational basis for judicial review. FMC v. Lane, 773 P.2d 163,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1989).

Where administrative hearing officer failed to include findings of fact and conclusions of law in his order denying attorney part of her requested fees in contested case relating to employee's application for disability benefits, supreme court could not accomplish meaningful review, requiring reversal and remand for hearing and development of adequate record. Cargile v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div. (In re Cargile), 965 P.2d 666,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo.), op. withdrawn, Pendelton v. State, 966 P.2d 951,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1998).

Agency is required to make findings of basic facts upon all material issues in proceeding and upon which its ultimate findings of fact or conclusions are based. Scott v. McTiernan, 974 P.2d 966,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1999), reh'g denied,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. Apr. 27, 1999).

Although hearing examiner's order was sparse and did not have separate headings for findings of fact and conclusions of law, it was sufficient to meet requirements of this section and provide court with a basis for review, where it listed pertinent facts and legal reasoning supporting denial of attorneys' fees. Whiteman v. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div., 984 P.2d 1079,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1999).

Medical commission hearing panel was obligated to include in its order the findings upon which it based its denial of an increased physical impairment rating to the employee, which included findings regarding the issue of causation with regard to each medical condition the employee put at issue. Himes v. Petro Eng. & Constr. (In re Workers Comp. Claim), 2003 WY 5, 61 P.3d 393,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 2003).

Agency order revoking an automobile dealer's license did not contain sufficient factual findings, as required by this section, for the court to understand the basis for the conclusion that the dealer's violations warranted revocation of its license, rather than a suspension or some other lesser punishment; the matter was thus remanded. State ex rel. DOT v. Legarda, 2003 WY 130, 77 P.3d 708,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 2003).

Wyoming Medical Commission Hearing Panel's order denying the employee workers' compensation benefits was facially insufficient to permit appellate review under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

16-3-110

as the order contained no indication the Commission considered and weighed all material evidence; specifically, there was no explanation how it weighed conflicting medical opinions. Decker v. State ex rel. Wyo. Med. Comm'n, 2005 WY 160, 124 P.3d 686,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 2005).

Suspension of a driver's license for failing to submit to a breath test was affirmed where the Office of Administrative Hearings' order set forth findings of fact sufficient to establish that probable cause existed; the signed statement of a deputy who had arrested the driver set forth his observations of the driver, including: (1) the driver's pickup truck appeared to have run off the road; (2) the driver walked with a staggered gait, his speech was slurred, and his breath smelled of alcohol; (3) the driver admitted to having consumed several shots of whisky and some beer, the last of which he consumed only 15 minutes before the deputy arrived; (4) the driver was able to successfully perform only one of five field sobriety tests; and (5) the driver refused to submit to chemical testing. Bradshaw v. Wyo. DOT Drivers' License Div., 2006 WY 70, 135 P.3d 612,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 2006).

Medical Commission Hearing Panel's order denying the claimant workers' compensation benefits for gastrointestinal problems violated the Wyoming Administrative Procedures Act by failing to make basic findings of fact that supported its ultimate findings; the decision cited no evidence or medical opinions and made no basic findings to support its conclusion that the claimant's condition changed substantially after August 2002 or to explain the conclusion that had the narcotic pain medications been responsible for the esophageal stricture, it would have appeared earlier. Olivas v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. (In re Workers Comp. Claim), 2006 WY 29, 130 P.3d 476,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 2006).

Medical Commission (Commission) sufficiently determined that a worker was not entitled to permanent total disability benefits under the odd lot doctrine because the Commission's panel (1) correctly stated controlling principles of law, and (2) properly recognized the worker carried the initial burden of proving de facto unemployability, which the worker did not do as the worker made no effort to find a job and such efforts would not have been futile, after engaging in a careful, lengthy analysis of the worker's condition and the various evaluations of the worker's potential employability, and (3) the panel's findings adequately explained the basis for the panel's decision. In re Worker's Comp. Claim of McIntosh v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2013 WY 135, 311 P.3d 608,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 2013).

Articulation of basic facts, without separate conclusions of law, reviewable. —

An order of the tax commission in a driver's license suspension case was reviewable even though it did not encompass findings of fact and conclusions of law separately stated, where a limited question was presented for the tax commission for decision, and the failure to separately state any conclusions of law did not inhibit appellate review. The thrust of the language in this section is to require the articulation of basic facts from which ultimate findings of fact are determined in order to facilitate judicial review. Harris v. Wyoming State Tax Comm'n, 718 P.2d 49,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 535

(Wyo. 1986).

It is insufficient for administrative agency to state only ultimate fact or conclusion

but each ultimate fact or conclusion must be thoroughly explained in order for a court to determine upon what basis each ultimate fact or conclusion was reached. Powell v. Board of Trustees, 550 P.2d 1112,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. 1976).

Court had no option but to remand contest over denial of a grading permit back to the board of county commissioners of Teton County, where the final order simply stated that “other siting alternatives exist for the location of a residence on [a]ppellant's lot that will not result in the residence penetrating the skyline” without findings as to even the obvious underlying facts. Frankel v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2002 WY 13, 39 P.3d 420,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 2002).

Review of burden of proof conclusion. —

In cases where an agency concludes that a party failed to meet its burden of proof, the case will be reviewed under the arbitrary, capricious and contrary to law language of §

16-3-114

.City of Casper v. Utech, 895 P.2d 449,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 1995).

Since the supreme court cannot reweigh the evidence nor redetermine the credibility of the evidence, no purpose is to be served by demanding the agency explain how it evaluated the evidence in arriving at a conclusion that a party failed to meet its burden of proof. City of Casper v. Utech, 895 P.2d 449,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 1995).

Decision letter in writing, containing findings and conclusions, satisfies requirements of this section.

Regan v. Casper, 494 P.2d 933,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 235

(Wyo. 1972).

Decision need not incorporate terminated employee's findings of fact and conclusions of law. —

There was substantial evidence to support the personnel commission's decision that a city employee was not wrongfully terminated, and there was no evidence that the commission acted arbitrarily or capriciously or denied the employee due process in failing to adopt employee's findings of fact and conclusions of law in its written decision; absent some direct evidence that a party's proposed findings were given no consideration, an agency's failure to adopt or address them does not equate with arbitrariness. Davis v. City of Cheyenne, 2004 WY 43, 88 P.3d 481,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 2004), reh'g denied,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. May 18, 2004).

Written facts need not have been drafted by hearing examiner. —

It is not required that a hearing examiner submit written findings that have been drafted by the hearing examiner; this section is satisfied so long as the document is adopted by the hearing examiner as the decision in the case. Pederson v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div., 939 P.2d 740,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1997).

When appealable final order exists after suspension of driver's license. —

The requisite administrative finality is not present for appeal to the district court, from the suspension of a driver's license by the motor vehicle division, until the appeal to the Wyoming tax commission has been pursued and concluded: This procedure then results in a final order of the tax commission, and it is from this order that the appeal is taken to the district court, and it is the only order which must be examined to determine if it meets the requirements of this section for findings of fact and conclusions of law. State, Dep't of Revenue & Taxation v. Andrews, 671 P.2d 1239,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 377

(Wyo. 1983).

Determination that citizen had not met burden of proof in seeking a revocation of funeral director's license sufficient to allow for review. —

Wyoming board of embalmers' determination that a private citizen had not met the requisite burden of proof in a proceeding seeking a revocation of a funeral director's license was sufficient to allow for appellate review. Veile v. Bryant, 2004 WY 107, 97 P.3d 787,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 2004).

Employee's dismissal supported by basic fact finding. —

A single, viable finding of basic fact, relating to a state employee's insubordination and her circumvention of established lines of authority, sufficiently articulated the reasons for the personnel review board's affirmation of her dismissal. Mekss v. Wyoming Girls' Sch., 813 P.2d 185,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 1991), reh'g denied, 813 P.2d 185,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1991), cert. denied, 502 U.S. 1032, 112 S. Ct. 872, 116 L. Ed. 2d 777, 1992 U.S. LEXIS 266 (U.S. 1992).

Substantial evidence supported findings of fact made by oil and gas conservation commission

as to restricting production from gas wells to prevent waste. — See Big Piney Oil & Gas Co. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 715 P.2d 557,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 507

(Wyo. 1986).

In determining whether further primary production in oil and gas field would be wasteful, finding of oil and gas conservation commission that secondary recovery operations would be economically feasible was supported with sufficient factual findings in record. See Majority of Working Interest Owners in Buck Draw Field Area v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 721 P.2d 1070,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 582

(Wyo. 1986).

Denial of part of requested attorney fees is adverse order. —

Administrative hearing officer's order awarding attorney fees and costs, which denied attorney part of her requested fees, was an adverse order subject to provisions of this section. Cargile v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div. (In re Cargile), 965 P.2d 666,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo.), op. withdrawn, Pendelton v. State, 966 P.2d 951,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1998).

Board of equalization determination not supported. —

Board of equalization's determination that highest and best use of rural electric cooperative's property was as an investor-owned utility was unsupported by law or basic facts, and was therefore reversed. Basin Elec. Power Coop. v. Department of Revenue, 970 P.2d 841,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1999).

Remand appropriate. —

State board of equalization's order of limited remand did not poison adjudicatory and review process where the state board was unable to determine the manner in which the county board arrived at its obsolescence figures; board's decision to order a limited remand rather than issue a final order merely stating that there was an insufficient basis for meaningful review expedited the substantive review of the county board's order. Holly Sugar Corp. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 839 P.2d 959,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 1992).

Remand was necessary where a hearing officer, in denying a claim for workers' compensation benefits, did not support his conclusions with adequate factual findings; no findings of fact were made regarding the claimant's evidence, other witnesses' testimony, or the time or cause of the injury. Bush v. State ex rel. Workers' Comp. Div., 2005 WY 120, 120 P.3d 176,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 2005).

Wyoming board of outfitters and professional guides failed to set forth sufficient findings of fact in support of its decision to revoke an outfitter's license, resulting in the reversal of the license revocation and a remand for further proceedings. City of Billings v. Wyo. Bd. of Outfitters & Guides (In re City of Billings), 2001 WY 81, 30 P.3d 557,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 2001).

Wyo. Oil and Gas Conservation Commission's findings of fact in
its decision allowing a junior gas producer to inject leftover carbon
dioxide into a geologic formation were inadequate; the decision did
not outline the facts on which it relied to resolve the senior producer's
contention that the plan would cause waste and compromise its correlative
rights under
Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 30-5-101(a)(ix).
Exxon Mobil Corp. v. Wyo. Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 2013 WY 32, 297 P.3d 782,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2013).

Remand not appropriate. —

Court rejected the taxpayer's claim that the County Board of Equalization's decision was inadequate and did not comply with statutory requirements provided in this section that an agency make findings of basic facts upon all of the material issues due to the Board's failure to address the issue of economic obsolescence in the taxpayer's appeal of the ad valorem personal property tax assessments at its coal mines that were recently purchased in 1998 because the taxpayer's expert did not directly contest the assessor's position that reliance on reasonably current, arms length 1998 sales values was an appropriate basis upon which to conclude no further economic obsolescence calculations were necessary. It would do little good to remand the matter in order for the County Board to state the obvious, that it found the 1998 allocated value, derived from an arms length transaction and provided by the taxpayer, fairly included economic obsolescence in 2001. Thunder Basin Coal Co. v. Campbell County, 2006 WY 44, 132 P.3d 801,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2006).

Applied

in

In re Assessment of State Bd. of Equalization, 457 P.2d 963,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1969); Wyoming. Geraud v. Schrader, 531 P.2d 872,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1975); Westates Constr. Co. v. Sheridan County Sch. Dist., 719 P.2d 1366,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 559

(Wyo. 1986); Harris v. Sinclair Trucking, 900 P.2d 1163,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 1995).

Quoted

in

Sellers v. Employment Sec. Comm'n, 760 P.2d 394,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 1988); Cook v. Zoning Bd. of Adjustment, 776 P.2d 181,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 1989); Department of Emp. v. Roberts Constr. Co., 841 P.2d 854,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1992); State ex rel. Workers' Safety & Compensation Div. v. Gerrard, 2001 WY 7, 17 P.3d 20,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2001).

Cited

in

Monahan v. Board of Trustees, 486 P.2d 235,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1971); Schulthess v. Carollo, 832 P.2d 552,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1992); Naibauer v. Board of Platte County Comm'rs, 895 P.2d 445,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 1995); Ebzery v. City of Sheridan, 982 P.2d 1251,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 1999); Williston Basin Interstate Pipeline Co. v. Wyoming PSC, 996 P.2d 663,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 2000); State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. v. Jensen, 2001 WY 51, 24 P.3d 1133,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2001).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Doctrine of Sovereign Immunity in Wyoming: Current Status of the Doctrine and Arguments for Abrogation,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 221 (1985).

For article, “A State Central Panel Hearing Officer System for Wyoming,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 497 (1986).

§ 16-3-111.
Contested cases; limitations on consultations and participations.

Unless required for the disposition of ex parte matters authorized by law, members of the agency, employees presiding at a hearing in a contested case and employees assisting the foregoing persons in compiling, evaluating and analyzing the record in a contested case or in writing a decision in a contested case shall not directly or indirectly in connection with any issue in the case consult with any person other than an agency member, officer, contract consultant or employee or other state or federal employee, any party other than the agency or with any agency employee, contract consultant or other state or federal employee who was engaged in the investigation, preparation, presentation or prosecution of the case except upon notice and opportunity for all parties to participate. Nothing herein contained precludes any agency member from consulting with other members of the agency. No officer, employee, contract consultant, federal employee or agent who has participated in the investigation, preparation, presentation or prosecution of a contested case shall be in that or a factually related case participate or advise in the decision, recommended decision or agency review of the decision, or be consulted in connection therewith except as witness or counsel in public proceedings. A staff member is not disqualified from participating or advising in the decision, recommended decision or agency review because he has participated in the presentation of the case in the event the staff member does not assert or have an adversary position.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 108, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 9-276.29; W.S. 1977, § 9-4-111; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Fair hearing requires impartial tribunal. —

Embraced by the employee's constitutional and statutory guarantee to a fair hearing in the administrative process is his right to be heard before an unbiased, fair and impartial tribunal. Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976).

And voir dire inquiry of administrative tribunal permitted. —

Within adequate guidelines, voir dire inquiry should be permitted of an administrative tribunal to ascertain the absence or presence of bias or prejudice of the members. Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976).

It is the plaintiff's burden to establish any impropriety

on the part of any member of the administrative board. Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976).

Presence of school board counsel at deliberative session did not violate this section,

where the attorney did not participate or advise and his presence did not influence the decisions of the individual members. Westates Constr. Co. v. Sheridan County Sch. Dist., 719 P.2d 1366,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 559

(Wyo. 1986).

Invited error. —

Worker could not claim on appeal that a Medical Commission panel improperly relied on the panel's own observations of the worker in determining the worker's eligibility for benefits because the worker asked the panel's members to engage in the contested observations. In re Worker's Comp. Claim of McIntosh v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2013 WY 135, 311 P.3d 608,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 2013).

Quoted

in

Denius v. T R Twelve, Inc., 589 P.2d 374,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 345

(Wyo. 1979).

Cited

in

Elementary Sch. Dist. v. District Boundary Bd., 454 P.2d 237,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1969); State Transp. Comm'n v. Ford, 844 P.2d 496,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 208

(Wyo. 1992); Basin Elec. Power Coop. v. Department of Revenue, 970 P.2d 841,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1998).

Law reviews. —

For article, “A State Central Panel Hearing Officer System for Wyoming,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 497 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Propriety of ex parte communication made in connection with administrative proceeding by interested party or by member or employee of agency (5 USC § 557(d)(1)), 58 ALR Fed 834.